Missouri, session 2026, SB1703.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 186, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto three new sections, to be known as sections
160.068, 186.085, and 186.095, to read as follows:
160.068. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Student Screen-Time Standards Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Instructional technology", a laptop, tablet,
computer, Chromebook, smart device, software platform, or
other similar device or platform used for student learning;
(2) "Manipulatives", hands-on physical learning items
including, but not limited to, blocks, counters, cubes,
rulers, cards, science materials, and similar educational
tools;
(3) "Traditional materials", printed books, paper-
based workbooks, notebooks, handwriting materials, and
physical educational resources.
3. For elementary school students in kindergarten
through grade five, each school district and charter school,
but not any virtual school, shall adopt a written screen
time and instructional technology policy consistent with

SB 1703 2
this section to promote the educational interests of
students, prevent the harmful effects of screen time on
child development, ensure that technology supports rather
than supplants foundational learning, and restore evidence-
based practices. The screen time and instructional
technology policy shall establish the following:
(1) Limits and restrictions on student screen time and
student use of instructional technology during the school
day;
(2) Limits and restrictions on school district- or
charter school-issued devices or school district or charter
school educational technology being used outside the school
day;
(3) Limits and restrictions on student access to
internet-connected instructional technology;
(4) The digital platforms used;
(5) Standards and requirements for student use of
manipulatives and traditional materials;
(6) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain
information regarding his or her child's screen time and
instructional technology use and the process for a parent or
guardian to limit or eliminate his or her child's screen
time and instructional technology use; and
(7) The research, evidence, and information upon which
the policy is based.
4. In creating the policy, the district or charter
school shall consider and document research on best
practices in literacy instruction, instructional technology,
and assessment and the optimal role for the use of
handwriting and cursive writing in promoting literacy for
all students.

SB 1703 3
5. Each elementary school shall notify parents and
guardians annually of the policy adopted under subsection 3
of this section. Parents and guardians of students in
grades kindergarten through five may, upon request, receive
information about their child's login time and use of
district-provided instructional technology and online
learning platforms. The district or charter school shall
provide such available information within a reasonable time
and at no cost to the parent or guardian.
6. Each elementary school shall publish such policy on
such school's website.
7. Each policy adopted under subsection 3 of this
section shall be periodically updated, including
incorporating the best practices recommendations from the
recommended model school board policy on screen time and use
of technology in instruction from the framework on classroom
use of screens (FOCUS) council created under section
186.095, when such recommendations become available.
8. This section shall be implemented before the end of
the 2027-28 school year and shall apply for all subsequent
school years.
186.085. The literacy advisory council established
under section 186.080 shall provide advice on the inclusion
of instruction and assessment of cursive writing and
reading, including the optimal role for the use of cursive
writing and reading in promoting literacy for all students.
Such advice shall include recommendations for a related
model policy on cursive.
186.095. 1. The commissioner of education shall
establish a "Framework on Classroom Use of Screens Council"
or "FOCUS Council". The council shall consist of at least
twelve but no more than fifteen members. The council shall

SB 1703 4
consist of the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee,
who shall serve as chair of the council. The other members
of the council shall be appointed by the commissioner and
shall include members representing the following stakeholder
groups:
(1) School boards;
(2) Charter schools;
(3) Elementary building principals who have gone
through leadership training through the Missouri leadership
development system;
(4) At least three teachers, including teachers with
expertise in reading instruction, math instruction, and
special education, with at least one teacher who has
participated in the Missouri leadership development system;
(5) A representative from a parental advocacy group
that represents children struggling with literacy and a
representative from an advocacy group that represents
children with disabilities;
(6) At least one faculty member of an institution of
higher education with an approved teacher preparation
program;
(7) A pediatric mental health professional or board-
certified behavioral analyst licensed in the state,
preferably with experience in technology and behavioral
responses; and
(8) A medical professional with expertise in child
health and development.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide necessary staff and resources for
the work of the advisory council.
3. (1) The council shall meet at least four times per
year in its initial year and at least twice per year

SB 1703 5
thereafter to conduct a comprehensive survey and analysis of
screen time and instructional technology use in public
schools and to review best practices regarding screen use
and the use of technology in instruction and related policy
provisions. Items and information related to such best
practices and policies shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Impacts on educational outcomes;
(b) Impacts on behavioral and discipline outcomes;
(c) Impacts on special education;
(d) Impacts on early childhood brain development,
including reading and writing skills;
(e) The deterioration of student competency in
reading, writing, arithmetic, and science;
(f) The need to strengthen human connection in
classrooms and support healthy, respectful relationships;
(g) The isolation of students in a digital and virtual
world; and
(h) Other such items and information to be determined
by the council.
(2) The council shall meet for the first time for
purposes of this subsection before December 1, 2026, and the
whole council or a subcommittee thereof shall hold at least
three additional meetings for purposes of this subsection
before July 1, 2027.
(3) On or before July 1, 2027, the council shall
submit a report containing the council's actions, findings,
recommendations, and policy proposals to the state board of
education, the governor, and the joint committee on
education.
(4) The recommendations shall include a recommended
model school board policy on screen time and instructional

SB 1703 6
technology use. The model policy shall recommend best
practices regarding:
(a) Student screen time;
(b) Student use of instructional technology;
(c) Restrictions on student screen time;
(d) Restrictions on student use of instructional
technology;
(e) Restrictions on student access to internet-
connected instructional technology;
(f) Student use of manipulatives and traditional
materials;
(g) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain
information regarding his or her child's screen time and
instructional technology use;
(h) Minimizing or eliminating school district- or
charter school-issued devices or school district or charter
school educational technology being used outside the school
day; and
(i) The process for a parent or guardian to limit or
eliminate his or her child's screen time and instructional
technology use.
(5) The recommendations may include suggested changes
to state law.
(6) The report shall be presented to the state board
of education and to the joint committee on education in
public hearings. The report shall be updated at least every
two years to provide additional information regarding the
council's actions, recommendations, and policy proposals.
✓